California, session 20252026, SB836.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25308 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25308. The commission and Public Utilities Commission, in coordination with the Independent System Operator, every five three years, shall review and update as necessary the Memorandum of Understanding Between the California Public Utilities Commission (CPUC) and the California Energy Commission (CEC) and the California Independent System Operator (ISO) Regarding Transmission and Resource Planning and Implementation (December 23, 2022) and the related workplan to ensure the memorandum and workplan reflect the coordination that is needed to help meet the state’s energy goals, including those goals described in Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code.